Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.420

Unauthorized examination of ballots, election materials—Revealing information.

(1) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to examine, or assist another to examine, any voter record, ballot, or any other state or local government official election material if the person, without lawful authority, conducts the examination:

(a) For the purpose of identifying the name of a voter and how the voter voted; or

(b) For the purpose of determining how a voter, whose name is known to the person, voted; or

(c) For the purpose of identifying the name of the voter who voted in a manner known to the person.

(2) Any person who reveals to another information which the person ascertained in violation of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(3) A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2120. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 2; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.020; prior: 1911 c 89 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 906; 1873 p 205 s 105; 1854 p 93 s 96; RRS s 5387. Formerly RCW 29.85.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.